Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2542
Notice; proceeding.

The board may provide for the publication of any resolution or other proceeding adopted by it pursuant to the Joint Public Agency Act in a newspaper of general circulation published in the area served by the joint public agency or, if no newspaper is so published, in a newspaper qualified to carry legal notices having general circulation in the area served by the joint public agency.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 42.